Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 970 (3) 91 lh/ko/md H.F. 970 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ DOUBLE 1 UP FOOD BUCKS PROGRAM ââ SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATION. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, in addition 5 to any other funding appropriated for such purposes for the 6 same fiscal year, the following amount or so much thereof as is 7 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 8 To provide grants to support the double up food bucks 9 program administered by the Iowa healthiest state initiative 10 to make fresh fruits and vegetables sold at farmers markets, 11 grocery stores, and other participating locations accessible 12 to individuals and families who reside in this state and 13 receive assistance through the federal supplemental nutrition 14 assistance program: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 A grant recipient that receives funding pursuant to this 17 section shall provide at least a dollar-for-dollar match of the 18 grant assistance. 19 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 20 section shall not revert at the close of the fiscal year, but 21 shall remain available for the purposes designated. 22 Sec. 2. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ 23 ELIGIBLE FOODS. 1. The department of health and human 24 services shall request that the food and nutrition services of 25 the United States department of agriculture provide approval, 26 for purposes of state administration of the supplemental food 27 and nutrition program, for a modification to the eligible foods 28 as defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§271.2 to only include healthy foods 29 and beverages based on necessary nutrition for good health, 30 including but not limited to healthy grains, dairy, meat, eggs, 31 peanut butter and nuts, pasta, rice, legumes, and fruits and 32 vegetables. 33 2. Upon receipt of federal approval as described in 34 subsection 1, the healthy food based on necessary nutrition for 35 -1- HF 970 (3) 91 lh/ko/md 1/ 2 H.F. 970 good health standards shall not be rescinded without enacting 1 legislation. 2 Sec. 3. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 3 effect on the date the department of health and human services 4 receives federal approval to modify eligible foods for purposes 5 of state administration of the supplemental food and nutrition 6 program as specified under this Act, if federal approval is 7 received: 8 The section of this Act making a supplemental appropriation 9 to the department of health and human services to provide 10 grants to support the double up food bucks program. 11 -2- HF 970 (3) 91 lh/ko/md 2/ 2